test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-vuollad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vuollâđ: # 
    vuollâđ+V+Inf: vuollâđ
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolluum
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuolluuh
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálloo
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuállojeen
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuolluuvettee
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuolluv
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuollup
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuolluuvetteđ
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuállojeh
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuállojim
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuollui
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuolluim
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuolluid
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuállojii
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuolluu
    vuollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuollum


  Verb - vuoššâđDer/Pass: # Generate from FST, corrected by ML       
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: vuoššuđ
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoššuum
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuoššuuh
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáššoo
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuáššojeen
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuoššuuvettee
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuoššuv
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuoššup
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuoššuuvetteđ
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuáššojeh
    
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuáššojim
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuáššojih
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoššui
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuoššuim
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuoššuid
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuoššuin
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuoššuim
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuoššuid
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuáššojii
    
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuoššuuččim
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuoššuuččih
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuoššuuččij
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuoššuuččáim
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuoššuuččáid
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuoššuuččáin
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuoššuuččijm
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuoššuuččijd
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuoššuuččii
    
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vuoššuužeem
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vuoššuužeeh
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vuošuš
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vuoššuužeen
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vuošušvettee
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vuoššuužává
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vuoššuužep
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vuošušvetteđ
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuoššuužeh
    
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuoššuu
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuáššojus
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du1: vuáššojoon
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du2: vuáššojee
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du3: vuáššojus
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuáššojop
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuoššuđ
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuáššojus
    
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuoššuu
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuoššum
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vuoššuužii
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: vuoššum
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: vuoššum
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: vuoššuumin
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: vuoššuumist
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: vuoššuumân
    vuoššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: vuoššuuhánnáá
